Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1522
Revenue bonds; where payable.

All revenue bonds issued pursuant to sections 85-1515 and 85-1520 to 85-1527 may be payable at the office of the State Treasurer, at such bank or trust company, either within or without the State of Nebraska, or at such other place as may be determined by the board.

Laws 1987, LB 329, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2650.10;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 36.